Wyoming, session 2025, HB0214.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 15-1-125(b), 15-4-302(a),
18-3-511(a), 18-3-810 and 18-3-811 are amended to read:
15-1-125. Presentation and payment of claims; when
warrant draws interest; exception.
(b) Upon the allowance of any claim or demand by the
governing body, the treasurer shall issue a check or
warrant make payment for the correct amount. The treasurer
may make payment by issuing a check or warrant or by using
an electronic payment method or fund transfer system. Any
check or warrant shall be signed by the mayor and
countersigned by the treasurer or any other person the
governing body designates to countersign checks or warrants
in the treasurer's absence. If there is not sufficient
money in the treasury to pay the warrant, the treasurer
shall endorse on the warrant the date and a statement that
it has been presented for payment but has not been paid for
want of funds. Thereafter, the warrant shall draw interest
at the rate of ten percent (10%) per year.
15-4-302. Finances; warrants; use for disbursements;
exception; limitations; contents; procedure.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, all
disbursements shall be made by check or warrant signed by
the manager and countersigned by the mayor or by using an
electronic payment method or fund transfer system. No check
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0214
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
or warrant may be drawn in payment of a claim, and no
electronic payment or fund transfer may be made, of more
than fifty dollars ($50.00) until the claim is certified by
the manager and allowed by resolution of the governing
body. Each electronic payment or fund transfer, check or
warrant shall specify its purpose and shall be made payable
to the order of the person in whose favor it is drawn.
18-3-511. Presentation, auditing and payment of
claims; issuance of tax-anticipation warrants; limitation
and form of warrants; effect of acceptance.
(a) All claims and demands against a county shall be
presented for audit and allowance to the board of county
commissioners before any action in court is maintainable.
All claims when allowed shall be paid in accordance with
this subsection. Claims may be paid by using an electronic
payment method or fund transfer system or by a county
warrant or order drawn by the board on the county treasurer
upon the proper funds in the treasury for the amount of the
claims. The Any warrant or order shall be signed by the
permanent or temporary chairman of the board, attested by
the county clerk under the seal of the county, and
countersigned and registered by the county treasurer. The
warrant or order shall specify the amount of the claim or
service and be numbered and dated in the order in which it
is issued. Such Electronic payments or fund transfers,
warrants and orders are payable on demand and shall be
drawn and issued upon the county treasurer only when there
are sufficient monies in the appropriate fund in the
treasury to pay such warrants and orders make the required
payments.
18-3-810. Restrictions upon countersigning warrants.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0214
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
No county treasurer shall countersign any blank county
order or warrant or other order or warrant, or make any
electronic payment or fund transfer, until he the treasurer
is satisfied that the electronic payment, order or warrant
was ordered drawn by the board of county commissioners.
18-3-811. Register of county orders and payments.
Each county treasurer shall keep in his office a book
called the register of county orders wherein shall be
entered on the date of the presentation thereof and without
interval or blank line between any entry and the one
preceding it every county order, warrant, electronic
payment or other certificate or evidence of county
indebtedness presented for payment whether or not it is
then paid, the date and number of such each electronic
payment, order or warrant, the amount payable, the name of
the person to whom such the electronic payment, order or
warrant is payable, and the name of the person presenting
the same. Every register of county orders shall be
available for inspection and examination by any person
during usual business hours.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0214
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4